Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-214
Limited period bingo, defined.

Limited period bingo shall mean a bingo occasion, authorized by the department to be conducted, which is in addition to a licensed organization's regularly scheduled bingo occasions.

Laws 1978, LB 351, § 11;

Laws 1984, LB 949, § 7;

R.S.Supp.,1984, § 9-134;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 15;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 17.